Washington statutes.
RCW 18.227.040

Practices not limited by chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict delivery of behavioral health interventions by an individual otherwise regulated under this title and performing services within their authorized scope of practice.

[ 2023 c 270 s 5.]